Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 26 Criminal Detention Facilities Standards
12-26-108. Failure to meet minimum standards — Procedure.

(1)If an inspection under this chapter discloses that the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility does not meet the minimum standards established by the Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator, the criminal detention facility review committee shall send notice, together with the inspection report, to the governing body responsible for the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility.

A copy of the notice required by this chapter shall also be sent to the administrative judge of a judicial district within the geographic area of the criminal detention facility review committee district in which the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility is located.

The appropriate governing body shall promptly meet to consider the inspection report, and the chair of the criminal detention facility review committee, or the chair's designee, shall appear to advise and consult concerning appropriate corrective action.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 741, §§ 9, 10; 1985, No. 539, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-1218, 46-1219; Acts 1989, No. 515, § 5; 2017, No. 153, § 7; 2017, No. 250, § 19.

12-26-109. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-27-101. Purposes and construction of the Division of Correction.

(1)The purpose of this act is to establish a Division of Correction that shall assume the custody, control, and management of the state penitentiary, execute the orders of criminal courts of the State of Arkansas, and provide for the custody, treatment, rehabilitation, and restoration of adult offenders as useful law-abiding citizens within the community.

The division shall be under the supervision and control of the Board of Corrections.

To accomplish the objectives and purposes of this act in an effective, coordinated, and uniform manner, the division shall be responsible for the maintenance, supervision, and administration of adult detention and correctional services of the state as determined by the board.

Institutions and services shall be diversified in program, construction, and staff to provide effectually and efficiently for the maximum custody, care, supervision, and treatment of those persons committed to the division.

This act shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-100; Acts 1993, No. 549, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 728.

12-27-102. Enforcement of penalties — Report of crimes.

All laws of this state prescribing penalties for violations concerned with or affecting the state penitentiary or inmates thereof shall be equally applicable to the Division of Correction and shall be enforced accordingly.

In the event any crime shall be committed in any institution of the division, it shall be the duty of the Director of the Division of Correction, or his or her designated employee, to report the crime to the county sheriff and prosecuting attorney of the county in which the institution is located in which the crime, or alleged crime, took place.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 22; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-131; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 729.

12-27-103. Division of Correction — Creation — Powers and duties.

There is established, under the supervision, control, and direction of the Board of Corrections, a Division of Correction.

The Division of Correction shall have the following functions, powers, and duties, administered in accordance with the policies and rules promulgated by the Board of Corrections:

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 3; 1977, No. 935, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-103; Acts 1993, No. 549, § 2; 2011, No. 184, § 1; 2015, No. 1206, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 878; 2019, No. 910, § 730.

12-27-104. Board of Corrections — Members — Records — Staff.

The Board of Corrections shall be composed of seven (7) voting members:

Five (5) citizen members;

The chair of the Parole Board; and

One (1) member of a criminal justice faculty who is employed at any four-year university in Arkansas.

The Board of Corrections shall elect a chair annually in accordance with rules developed by the Board of Corrections.

(1)All members of the Board of Corrections shall serve a term of seven (7) years, unless they resign or are removed.

Vacancies occurring before the expiration of a term shall be filled in the manner provided for members first appointed.

Members shall serve until their replacements are appointed.

The Governor shall appoint those members not determined by virtue of their office when vacancies occur.

(1)(A)A member of the Board of Corrections may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 46, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9719; Acts 1919, No. 482, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 12750; Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 2; 1975, No. 378, § 12; 1979, No. 661, § 1; 1979, No. 918, § 1; 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 1; 1985, No. 734, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 7-203.2, 46-101, 46-102; Acts 1989, No. 708, § 1; 1989, No. 937, § 4; 1993, No. 549, § 3; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 26, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 71; 2009, No. 958, § 1; 2009, No. 962, § 29; 2019, No. 315, §§ 879, 880; 2019, No. 910, §§
731-734.

12-27-105. Board's powers and duties.

The purpose of the Board of Corrections is to manage correctional resources in the state such that offenders are held accountable for their actions, victims' needs are addressed in a positive manner, and the safety of society is enhanced.

In furtherance of its purpose, the Board of Corrections shall have the following powers and duties:

(A)General supervisory power and control over the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction and shall perform all functions with respect to the management and control of the adult correctional institutions and community correction options of this state contemplated by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 28; Pope's Dig., §§ 12695, 12775, 12776; Acts 1937, No. 140, §§ 2, 3; 1945, No. 13, §§ 2, 3; 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 2; 1975, No. 378, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-101, 46-108 — 46-110; Acts 1993, No. 549, § 4; 2013, No. 1277, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 881; 2019, No. 910, §§
735-738.

12-27-106. Publication of rules — Report concerning administrative directives and administrative memoranda filed with Legislative Council.

The Board of Corrections shall make available in conspicuous places all rules promulgated by the board with reference to the conduct of the persons committed to or housed in correctional facilities that are operated or contracted by the divisions and agencies the board governs.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the board shall file a report with the Legislative Council on a quarterly basis containing all new and revised administrative directives and administrative memoranda issued in the previous quarter by:

History.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 12655; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-132; Acts 2015, No. 1258, § 14; 2019, No. 315, § 882; 2019, No. 396, § 1.

12-27-107. Director of the Division of Correction.

Administer the Division of Correction and supervise the administration of all institutions, facilities, and services under the jurisdiction of the Division of Correction;

Employ such personnel as are required in the administration of the provisions of this act, provided that the employment of personnel shall be in accordance with the applicable laws and personnel rules of the state;

Institute programs for the training and development of personnel within the Division of Correction and have authority to suspend, discharge, or otherwise discipline personnel in accordance with policies prescribed by the Board of Corrections;

Make an annual report to the Board of Corrections, which will be forwarded to the Governor and the General Assembly, on the work of the Division of Correction, including statistics and other data, income derived by the Division of Correction from agriculture, livestock, and other farming activities and from prison inmates' activities, a summary of expenditures of the Division of Correction, and progress reports regarding internal issues such as inmate discipline, utilization of programming, facilities and bed space utilization, upkeep issues, and construction needs;

Cooperate with the Division of Community Correction, the Parole Board, the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, judicial districts, counties, and municipalities to provide the guidance and services required to ensure a full range of correctional options for the state as a whole; and

(A)Designate those employees of the Division of Correction who shall have the powers of peace officers in the enforcement of criminal laws to the extent they apply to employees, inmates, and persons on Division of Correction property, while participating in the search and capture of an inmate who has escaped custody, or while assisting law enforcement officers in the search and capture of any fugitive or escapee from another jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, §§ 4, 5; 1975, No. 733, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-104, 46-105; Acts 1993, No. 549, § 5; 1997, No. 943, § 1; 2003, No. 351, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 883; 2019, No. 910, §
739.

12-27-108. Authentication of records.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 4; 1975, No. 733, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-104; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 884; 2019, No. 910, §
740.

12-27-109. Oaths of director and other authorized persons.

The Director of the Division of Correction and each person authorized by the Board of Corrections to assume the duties of the director on an interim or acting basis shall, before discharging his or her prescribed duties, take and subscribe to and file in the office of the Secretary of State, an oath that he or she will support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution and faithfully perform the prescribed duties upon which he or she is about to enter.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 4; 1975, No. 733, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-104; 2019, No. 208, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 741.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 741, amended this section to replace “Department“ with “Division” in the phrase “of the superintendents of the institutions within the Department of Correction”. However, Acts 2019, No. 208, § 1, specifically repealed this phrase.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 208 substituted “other authorized persons” for “superintendents” in the section heading; substituted “person authorized by the Board of Corrections to assume the duties of the director on an interim or acting basis” for “of the superintendents of the institutions within the Department of Correction”, substituted “discharging his or her prescribed duties” for “entering upon their respective duties”, and inserted the second occurrence of “prescribed”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”.

12-27-110. Administrative headquarters.

The Board of Corrections shall locate the administrative headquarters of the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction at a suitable site or sites to be chosen by the board.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 464, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-103.1; Acts 2001, No. 614, § 1.

12-27-111. Improvements.

The Board of Corrections and the Director of the Department of Correction shall decide what improvements are necessary, which are not otherwise provided by law. These improvements shall be made under the direction and supervision of the director.

In making any necessary improvements under the provisions of this section, if in his or her discretion it shall be deemed necessary, the director may employ the services of an engineer, draftsman, or architect to make such plans and specifications as may be necessary.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The powers and duties of the State Penitentiary referred to in this section were transferred to the Department of Correction by Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 3.

When a prisoner is committed to the Division of Correction, his or her commitment papers must include a report on the circumstances attending the offense, particularly such circumstances as tend to aggravate or extenuate the offense, which report shall be kept in the permanent file of such prisoner.

The report shall be prepared by the prosecutor or deputy prosecutor who represented the state in the proceeding against the prisoner. The report shall be approved by the sentencing judge.

A county sheriff, a deputy county sheriff, or a trained security contractor shall transport all inmates committed to the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction as described in this subsection, and the county sheriff is entitled to the fees provided by law.

A county sheriff shall notify the director of the number of inmates in his or her charge who are under commitment to the Division of Correction, and upon request to the county sheriff by the director, the county sheriff, the deputy county sheriff, or the trained security contractor shall send for, take charge of, and safely transport the inmates to the nearest appropriate facility as determined by the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.

However, if the county sheriff determines that it would be in the best interest of an inmate and the public to immediately transport the inmate to the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction because of overcrowding or another issue, the county sheriff may notify the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction of the need for immediate transport and the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction shall consider the request in scheduling inmates for intake.

The director shall make and preserve a full and complete record of every inmate committed to the Division of Correction, along with a photograph of the inmate and data pertaining to his or her trial conviction and past history.

To protect the integrity of records described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section and to ensure their proper use, it is unlawful to permit inspection of or disclose information contained in records described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section or to copy or issue a copy of all or part of a record described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section except:

As authorized by rule;

By order of a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Records posted on the Division of Correction's website as required by § 12-27-145.

A rule under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section shall provide for adequate standards of security and confidentiality of records described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section.

For those inmates committed to the Division of Correction and judicially transferred to the Division of Community Correction, the preparation of a record described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section may be delegated to the Division of Community Correction pursuant to policies applicable to records transmission adopted by the Board of Corrections.

A rule under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section may authorize the disclosure of information contained in a record described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section for research purposes.

Upon written request, an employee of the Bureau of Legislative Research acting on behalf of a member of the General Assembly may view all records described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section of a current or former inmate.

A request under subdivision (e)(5)(A)(i) of this section shall be made in good faith.

A view of records under this subdivision (e)(5) by an employee may be performed only if the employee is assigned to one (1) or more of the following committees:

Senate Committee on Judiciary;

House Committee on Judiciary; or

Charitable, Penal, and Correctional Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.

The Division of Correction shall ensure that the employee authorized under subdivision (e)(5)(B) of this section to view records is provided access to the records.

A record requested to be viewed under this subdivision (e)(5) is privileged and confidential and shall not be shown to any person not authorized to have access to the record under this section and shall not be used for any political purpose, including without limitation political advertising, fundraising, or campaigning.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 895, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement wide-ranging reforms to the criminal justice system in order to address prison overcrowding, promote seamless reentry into society, reduce medical costs incurred by the state and local governments, aid law enforcement agencies in fighting crime and keeping the peace, and to enhance public safety.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by No. 895 rewrote (e)(1) through (4); and added (e)(5).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1171 rewrote (d).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1265 rewrote (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules and procedures” for “rules, procedures, and regulations” in (b)(1).

Cross References. Use of county jail fund for supervision and transportation of inmates, §12-41-716.

Disclosure of inmate records is only permissible when authorized by administrative regulation or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction. Furman v. Holloway, 312 Ark. 378, 849 S.W.2d 520 (1993).

A court of competent jurisdiction can order disclosure of an inmate's records, and the inmate need not establish a “particularized need” for the information requested. Furman v. Holloway, 312 Ark. 378, 849 S.W.2d 520 (1993).

Restrictions on an inmate's inspection of his records, allowing only one inspection per six-month period and authorizing the Department of Correction to remove from the inmate's file any documents it deemed to be of a sensitive or confidential nature and which would cause great harm to third persons if disclosed to the inmate or any other member of the public, were permissible under this section and reasonable. Furman v. Holloway, 312 Ark. 378, 849 S.W.2d 520 (1993).

An administrative directive pertaining to the disclosure of inmate records was not a regulation establishing an exemption as contemplated by subdivision (e)(2) of this section since such directive had not been adopted by the board and was not registered with the Secretary of State. Orsini v. State, 340 Ark. 665, 13 S.W.3d 167 (2000).

Inmate not denied due process when he was transferred to a maximum security prison as he had no justifiable expectation that he would be incarcerated in any particular prison within Arkansas. Whittington v. Norris, 602 F. Supp. 954 (E.D. Ark. 1984).

Cited: Pennington v. State, 260 Ark. 844, 545 S.W.2d 72 (1977).

(1)(A)(i)In the event the Department of Correction cannot accept inmates from county jails due to insufficient bed space, the Department of Correction shall reimburse the counties from the County Jail Reimbursement Fund at rates determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after consultation with Arkansas Legislative Audit and the Department of Correction and upon approval by the Governor, until the appropriation and funding provided for that purpose are exhausted.

The reimbursement rate shall include the county's cost of transporting the inmates to the Department of Correction.

Reimbursement shall begin on the date of sentencing if the judgment and commitment order is received by the Department of Correction not later than twenty-one (21) days from the sentencing date.

If the judgment and commitment order is received by the Department of Correction twenty-two (22) or more days after the sentencing date, reimbursement shall begin on the date the Department of Correction receives the judgment and commitment order.

Reimbursement shall begin on either the date of sentencing or the date of placement on probation accompanied with incarceration in the Department of Community Correction if the judgment and commitment order or the judgment and disposition order, whichever is applicable, is received by the Department of Community Correction not later than twenty-one (21) days from either the date of sentencing or the date of placement on probation accompanied with incarceration in the Department of Community Correction.

If the judgment and commitment order or the judgment and disposition order, whichever is applicable, is received by the Department of Community Correction twenty-two (22) or more days after the date of sentencing or the date of placement on probation accompanied with incarceration in the Department of Community Correction, reimbursement shall begin on the date the Department of Community Correction receives either the judgment and commitment order or the judgment and disposition order, whichever is applicable.

(1)(A)The Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction shall prepare an invoice during the first week of each month that lists each state inmate that is on the county jail backup list during the previous month.

The invoice shall reflect the number of days a state inmate was in the county jail in an awaiting-bed-space status.

(A)The Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction shall verify and forward the invoices to the applicable county sheriff to certify the actual number of days the state inmates were physically housed in the county jail.

Upon written request of a county judge, county treasurer, or county sheriff, the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction shall provide to the county official making the request a written report summarizing the year-to-date county jail reimbursement invoices prepared and forwarded for verification by the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction and payment from the fund.

In addition, the written report shall include a summary of invoices returned by each county for payment for previous months within the fiscal year, the amounts paid, and any balances owed.

Payment from the fund shall be made within (5) business days of receipt of signed and certified invoices returned by each county, subject to funding made available for payment of the certified notices.

The documentation maintained by the county sheriff is subject to review by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

The county sheriff shall maintain documentation for three (3) calendar years to confirm the number of days each state inmate was physically housed in the county jail.

Invoices under this subsection may be mailed or sent electronically.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 15, provided:

“COUNTY REIMBURSEMENT RATE RESTRICTION. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or departmental commitment which may exist to the contrary, the Board of Corrections shall not increase any reimbursement rate for payments made to any county for the purpose of reimbursing the expenses of the care and custody of state inmates, without first seeking and receiving the approval of the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 16, provided:

“COUNTY JAIL REIMBURSEMENT. In the event the Department of Correction cannot accept inmates from county jails due to insufficient bed space, the Department shall reimburse the counties at a rate determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after consultation with the Division of Legislative Audit and the Department of Correction, and upon approval by the Governor, until the appropriation and funding for such purpose, is exhausted. The reimbursement rate shall include the county's cost of transporting the inmates to the department. The appropriation provided by Item (06) of Section 3 may be used for contracts with county jails for pre release inmates.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 31, provided:

“The Departments of Correction and Community Correction, shall at a minimum and on a fiscal year basis, prepare and post on the applicable agency web site, a monthly summary of county jail reimbursement invoices prepared and forwarded to each county sheriff for verification by the Departments and for payment from the County Jail Reimbursement Fund. In addition, the report shall include a summary of invoices returned by each county for payment for previous months within the fiscal year, the amounts paid, and any balances owed. Each fiscal year-end report shall be maintained on the web sites for a period of no less than three (3) years.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 1075, § 21, provided:

“COUNTY JAIL INVOICE SUMMARY. The Departments of Correction and Community Correction, shall at a minimum and on a fiscal year basis, prepare and post on the applicable agency web site, a monthly summary of county jail reimbursement invoices prepared and forwarded to each county sheriff for verification by the Departments and for payment from the County Jail Reimbursement Fund. In addition, the report shall include a summary of invoices returned by each county for payment for previous months within the fiscal year, the amounts paid, and any balances owed. Each fiscal year-end report shall be maintained on the web sites for a period of no less than three (3) years.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 266, § 15, provided: “COUNTY REIMBURSEMENT RATE RESTRICTION. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or departmental commitment which may exist to the contrary, the Board of Corrections shall not increase any reimbursement rate for payments made to any county for the purpose of reimbursing the expenses of the care and custody of state inmates, without first seeking and receiving the approval of the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2016, No. 266, § 16, provided: “COUNTY JAIL REIMBURSEMENT. In the event the Department of Correction cannot accept inmates from county jails due to insufficient bed space, the Department shall reimburse the counties at a rate determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after consultation with the Division of Legislative Audit and the Department of Correction, and upon approval by the Governor, until the appropriation and funding for such purpose, is exhausted. The reimbursement rate shall include the county's cost of transporting the inmates to the department. The appropriation provided by Item (06) of Section 3 may be used for contracts with county jails for pre release inmates.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2016, No. 266, § 31, provided: “COUNTY JAIL INVOICE SUMMARY. The Departments of Correction and Community Correction, shall at a minimum and on a fiscal year basis, prepare and post on the applicable agency web site, a monthly summary of county jail reimbursement invoices prepared and forwarded to each county sheriff for verification by the Departments and for payment from the County Jail Reimbursement Fund. In addition, the report shall include a summary of invoices returned by each county for payment for previous months within the fiscal year, the amounts paid, and any balances owed. Each fiscal year-end report shall be maintained on the web sites for a period of no less than three (3) years.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment redesignated former (b)(2) as present (b)(2)(A); and added (b)(2)(B).

The 2013 amendment inserted “or sanction imposed in response to a violation of supervision conditions” in (a)(2)(A).

The 2015 amendment by No. 946, in (c)(1), substituted “rules” for “regulations” near the beginning and substituted “upon receipt of a correct sentencing order” for “for more than thirty (30) days”; and added (c)(3).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1201 rewrote (b)(1)(A); substituted “a state inmate” for “an inmate” in (b)(1)(B); inserted “written” in (b)(2)(B)(ii); added (b)(3)(B); in (b)(4), substituted “state inmate” for “inmate” and inserted “physically”; and added (b)(6).

Ark. L. Rev.

Mason L. Boling, Legislative Note: That Was the Easy Part: The Development of Arkansas's Public Safety Improvement Act of 2011, and Why the Biggest Obstacle to Prison Reform Remains Intact, 66 Ark. L. Rev. 1109 (2013).

In a true emergency situation, health care may be rendered without prior approval.

The Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction shall be notified of a true emergency situation immediately after the true emergency situation.

When any county in which an institution of the Department of Correction is located shall incur expenses in connection with any legal proceedings involved or occasioned by any inmate of a penal institution, the county shall be entitled to reimbursement for such expenses from the Department of Correction Fund.

All claims by counties against the fund pursuant to this section shall be itemized, and the claims shall be verified by the county judge and presented to the Director of the Department of Correction within ninety (90) days after the expense is incurred.

Upon receipt of the verified claims, the director shall pay the claim from funds appropriated for the maintenance and operation of the department.

Except as authorized by the Board of Corrections, no officer of the Department of Correction or employee of the department shall give to anyone any fuel, forage, provisions, or manufactured articles under his or her charge, nor permit such things to be taken or used except for the use and benefit of the state.

(1)The department may provide a program to provide for the orderly and equitable issuance or sale of surplus items produced or processed by the farming operations of the department to employees and, if the department provides the program, the department shall implement a monitoring system to guarantee fiscal accountability in the program.

Individuals whose duties require long working hours beyond the normal workday of approximately 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., and the normal workweek of five (5) days a week;

Individuals required for long working hours, regularly worked weekends, and holidays; or

Individuals on twenty-four-hour call, seven (7) days a week.

As determined by availability after meeting the needs of the inmate population, reasonable quantities of items produced or processed by the farming operations of the department or purchased in bulk for processing shall be made available under this section.

(A)Fresh surplus vegetables will be available at the cost of production as determined by the Department of Correction's Farm Accounting Division and Central Office Accounting Division to all nonemergency force employees.

There shall be a twenty-five-dollar-per-month minimum allowance for commissary items.

Vegetables will be for the use of the employee and domicile correction's family only.

Only one (1) member of the domicile family will be entitled to the issuance or purchase of vegetables.

The department will implement, maintain, and guarantee accountability of all items so issued to assure fiscal responsibility and total honesty in the program.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “or processed” in (b)(1) and twice in (b)(3).

The 2011 amendment by No. 182, in (b)(1), substituted “may provide” for “shall adopt rules and regulations to establish” and substituted “if the department provides the program, the department” for “in addition”.

The 2011 amendment by No. 779 added “shall be made available under this section” at the end of (b)(3).

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 63, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9717; Pope's Dig., § 12748; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-114.

12-27-112. Sale of lands and facilities of the Department of Correction.

None of the lands under the control and jurisdiction of the State Penitentiary on March 1, 1968, shall be sold or otherwise disposed of by the Board of Corrections or the Department of Correction except upon specific authorization by the General Assembly.

(1)The authority granted state boards and commissions to sell land belonging to state institutions, as provided in §§22-6-601 and22-6-602, shall not be applicable to the penitentiary, the board, and the department.

It is the intent of this section that lands under the control and jurisdiction of the penitentiary on March 1, 1968, may be sold or otherwise disposed of only upon specific authorization therefor by laws enacted by the General Assembly subsequent to March 1, 1968.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 40; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-111.

12-27-113. Commitments to the Division of Correction — Records.

(1)All commitments to the Division of Correction shall be to the Division of Correction and not to a particular institution.

Commitments may provide for judicial transfer to the Division of Community Correction.

(1)The Director of the Division of Correction, in accordance with the rules and procedures promulgated by the Board of Corrections shall transfer an inmate to the Division of Community Correction, pursuant to a judicial transfer, or assign a newly committed inmate to an appropriate facility of the Division of Correction.

The director may transfer an inmate from one (1) facility to another consistent with the commitment and in accordance with treatment, training, and security needs.

Inmates may be transferred between the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction within the constraints of law applicable to judicial transfer, subject to the policies, rules, and regulations established by the Board of Corrections, and conditions set by the Parole Board.

The Division of Correction shall retain legal custody of all inmates transferred to community correction unless altered by court order.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 13; Pope's Dig., § 12658; Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, §§ 6, 19, 38; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-106 — 46-106.2, 46-135; Acts 1989, No. 897, § 1; 1993, No. 549, § 6; 2001, No. 615, § 1; 2015, No. 895, § 7; 2015, No. 1171, § 1; 2015, No. 1265, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 885.

12-27-114. Inmates in county jails — Reimbursement of county — Medical care.

(A)In the event the Department of Community Correction cannot accept inmates from county jails due to insufficient bed space or shall have an inmate confined in a county jail under any prerelease program or sanction imposed in response to a violation of supervision conditions, the Department of Community Correction shall reimburse the counties from the fund at rates determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after consultation with Arkansas Legislative Audit and the Department of Correction, and upon approval by the Governor, until the appropriation and funding provided for that purpose are exhausted.

(A)The certified invoices shall then be returned to the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction for payment from the fund.

(1)The Board of Corrections shall adopt rules by which the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction may reimburse any county, which is required to retain an inmate awaiting delivery to the custody of either the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction upon receipt of a correct sentencing order, for the actual costs paid for any emergency medical care for physical injury or illness of the inmate retained under this section if the injury or illness is directly related to the incarceration and the county is required by law to provide the care for inmates in the jail.

The Director of the Department of Correction or his or her designee or the Director of the Department of Community Correction or his or her designee may accept custody of any inmate as soon as possible upon request of the county upon determining that the inmate is required to have extended medical care.

(A)Reimbursements for medical expenses shall require prior approval of the Department of Correction or the Department of Community Correction before the rendering of health care.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 648, § 19; 1991, No. 329, §§ 2, 3; 1991, No. 574, §§ 2, 3; 1991, No. 644, § 3; 1995, No. 316, § 13; 2003, No. 370, § 1; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 1; 2005, No. 2192, § 1; 2013, No. 1282, § 1; 2015, No. 946, § 1; 2015, No. 1201, § 1.

12-27-115. Claims of counties for expenses — Verification.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 43; 1981, No. 58, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-162.

12-27-116. Use of fuel and provisions — Issuance or sale of items produced.

Only those individuals identified as emergency force personnel meeting the following requirements may participate in the issuance of items under this program:

History.

Acts 1893, No. 76, § 54, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9723; Pope's Dig., § 12754; Acts 1981, No. 139, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-129; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 118, § 33; 2009, No. 283, § 1; 2011, No. 182, § 1; 2011, No. 779, § 22.

12-27-117. Employees' uniforms.

The Department of Correction is authorized to purchase identifying occupational uniforms for correctional personnel as approved by the Board of Corrections.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 953, § 21.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §12-27-117 which concerned employee's uniforms, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 648, § 20.